Utah statutes.
31A-17-510.   Optional reserve calculation.

(1)  Reserves for all policies and contracts issued prior to January 1, 1994, may be calculated, at the option of the company, according to any standards which produce greater aggregate reserves for all such policies and contracts than the minimum reserves required by the laws in effect immediately prior to that date.  Reserves for any category of policies, contracts, or benefits as established by the commissioner, issued on or after January 1, 1994, may be calculated, at the option of the company, according to any standards which produce greater aggregate reserves for such category than those calculated according to the minimum standard herein provided, but the rate or rates of interest used for policies and contracts, other than annuity and pure endowment contracts, may not be higher than the corresponding rate or rates of interest used in calculating any nonforfeiture benefits provided therein.

(2)  Any such company which at any time shall have adopted any standard of valuation producing greater aggregate reserves than those calculated according to the minimum standard herein provided may, with the approval of the commissioner, adopt any lower standard of valuation, but not lower than the minimum herein provided; provided, however, that, for the purposes of this section, the holding of additional reserves previously determined by a qualified actuary to be necessary to render the opinion required by Section 31A-17-502 may not be considered to be the adoption of a higher standard of valuation.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

